District of Columbia statutes.
24-221.04

Forfeiture.

The award of good time credits for good behavior and faithful performance of duties may be forfeited, withheld, and restored by the Director, in accordance with rules promulgated by the Mayor pursuant to § 24-221.02, after a hearing, which shall be conducted in accordance with the rules.

Apr. 11, 1987, D.C. Law 6-218, § 6, 34 DCR 484

History

1981 Ed., § 24-432.

Prior Codifications